test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_nik_gt-norm.yaml
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: ninikishibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: ninikishibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: ninikishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: ginikishibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: ginikishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: ginikishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: onikishibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: onikishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: onikishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: inikishibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: inikishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: inikishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikinaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikinaanidig, ninikinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikinaanidig, ninikinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikinaanidig, ninikinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+21+Pret+Loc: ginikinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+21+Pret+Obv: ginikinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+21+Pret+Pl: ginikinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikinaanidig, ginikinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikinaanidig, ginikinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikinaanidig, ginikinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikiwaadig, ginikiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikiwaadig, ginikiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikiwaadig, ginikiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikiniidig, onikiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikiniidig, onikiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikiniidig, onikiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikiwaadig, onikiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikiwaadig, onikiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikiwaadig, onikiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikenyishibaniing
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikenyishibaniin
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikenyishibaniin
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikensishibaniing
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikensishibaniin
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikensishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: ninikenyimishinaan
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: ninikensimishinaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21: ginikenyimishinaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: ginikenyimishiwaa
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21: ginikensimishinaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl: ginikensimishiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv: onikenyimishini
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl: onikenyimishiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv: onikensimishini
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl: onikensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ninikenyimishiban
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ninikenyimishidig, ninikenyimishidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ninikensimishiban
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ninikensimishidig, ninikensimishidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ginikenyimishiban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ginikenyimishidig, ginikenyimishidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ginikensimishiban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ginikensimishidig, ginikensimishidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: onikenyimishiban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [onikenyimishidig, onikenyimishidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: onikensimishiban
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [onikensimishidig, onikensimishidog]
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: inikenyimishiban
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [inikenyimishidig, inikenyimishidog]
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: inikensimishiban
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [inikensimishidig, inikensimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ninikenyimishing
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ninikenyimishan
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ninikenyimishan
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ninikensimishing
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ninikensimishan
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ninikensimishan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ginikenyimishing
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ginikenyimishan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ginikenyimishan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ginikensimishing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ginikensimishan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ginikensimishan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: onikenyimishing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: onikenyimishan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: onikenyimishan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: onikensimishing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: onikensimishan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: onikensimishan
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: inikenyimishing
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: inikenyimishan
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: inikenyimishan
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: inikensimishing
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: inikensimishan
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: inikensimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret: ninikenyiminaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikenyiminaanidig, ninikenyiminaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret: ninikensiminaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikensiminaanidig, ninikensiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pret: ginikenyiminaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+21+VocPl: [ginikenyiminaanidig, ginikenyiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret: ginikenyimiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikenyimiwaadig, ginikenyimiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Pret: ginikensiminaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl: [ginikensiminaanidig, ginikensiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret: ginikensimiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikensimiwaadig, ginikensimiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret: onikenyiminiiban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [onikenyiminiidig, onikenyiminiidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret: onikenyimiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [onikenyimiwaadig, onikenyimiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Pret: onikensiminiiban
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [onikensiminiidig, onikensiminiidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Pret: onikensimiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [onikensimiwaadig, onikensimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Loc: ninikenyiminaaning
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Obv: ninikenyiminaanin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pl: ninikenyiminaanin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Loc: ninikensiminaaning
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Obv: ninikensiminaanin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pl: ninikensiminaanin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+21+Loc: ginikenyiminaaning
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+21+Obv: ginikenyiminaanin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pl: ginikenyiminaanin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Loc: ginikenyimiwaang
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Obv: ginikenyimiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pl: ginikenyimiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Loc: ginikensiminaaning
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Obv: ginikensiminaanin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Pl: ginikensiminaanin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Loc: ginikensimiwaang
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Obv: ginikensimiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pl: ginikensimiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Loc: onikenyiminiing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Obv: onikenyiminiin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pl: onikenyiminiin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Loc: onikenyimiwaang
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Obv: onikenyimiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pl: onikenyimiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Loc: onikensiminiing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Obv: onikensiminiin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Pl: onikensiminiin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Loc: onikensimiwaang
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Obv: onikensimiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Pl: onikensimiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: ninikenyimibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: ninikenyimibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: ninikenyimibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: ninikensimibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: ninikensimibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: ninikensimibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: ginikenyimibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: ginikenyimibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: ginikenyimibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: ginikensimibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: ginikensimibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: ginikensimibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: onikenyimibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: onikenyimibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: onikenyimibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: onikensimibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: onikensimibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: onikensimibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: inikenyimibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: inikenyimibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: inikenyimibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: inikensimibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: inikensimibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: inikensimibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+1Pl+Pret: ninikenyishinaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikenyishinaanidig, ninikenyishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Pret: ninikensishinaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikensishinaanidig, ninikensishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+21+Pret: ginikenyishinaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+21+VocPl: [ginikenyishinaanidig, ginikenyishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pret: ginikenyishiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikenyishiwaadig, ginikenyishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Pret: ginikensishinaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl: [ginikensishinaanidig, ginikensishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret: ginikensishiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikensishiwaadig, ginikensishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret: onikenyishiniiban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [onikenyishiniidig, onikenyishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret: onikenyishiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [onikenyishiwaadig, onikenyishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret: onikensishiniiban
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [onikensishiniidig, onikensishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret: onikensishiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [onikensishiwaadig, onikensishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+1Pl+Loc: ninikenyishinaaning
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+1Pl+Obv: ninikenyishinaanin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+1Pl+Pl: ninikenyishinaanin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Loc: ninikensishinaaning
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Obv: ninikensishinaanin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Pl: ninikensishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+21+Loc: ginikenyishinaaning
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+21+Obv: ginikenyishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+21+Pl: ginikenyishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Loc: ginikenyishiwaang
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Obv: ginikenyishiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pl: ginikenyishiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Loc: ginikensishinaaning
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Obv: ginikensishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Pl: ginikensishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Loc: ginikensishiwaang
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Obv: ginikensishiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pl: ginikensishiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Loc: onikenyishiniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Obv: onikenyishiniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pl: onikenyishiniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Loc: onikenyishiwaang
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Obv: onikenyishiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pl: onikenyishiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Loc: onikensishiniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Obv: onikensishiniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pl: onikensishiniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Loc: onikensishiwaang
